test/src/morphology/V-sircj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - сырць: # Verb 'to look' - partial paradigm
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: сырӈадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: сырӈан
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сырӈа
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: сырӈаниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: сырӈадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сырӈахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: сырӈаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: сырӈадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сырӈаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: сырӈадамзь # сырӈаманзь
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: сырӈанась
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сырӈась
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: сырӈанинзь
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: сырӈадинзь
#    сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сырӈаӈаханзь
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сырӈаханзь
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: сырӈаваць
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: сырӈадаць
     сырць+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сырӈаць
     сырць+V+IV+Hort+ScSg1: сыркадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Imprt+ScSg2: сырˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Opt+ScSg3: сырӈая
     сырць+V+IV+Hort+ScDu1: сырканиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Imprt+ScDu2: сырӈадиʼ # or сыртиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Opt+ScDu3: сырӈаяхаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Hort+ScPl1: сыркаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Imprt+ScPl2: сырӈадаˮ # or сыртаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Opt+ScPl3: сырӈаяˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg1: сыръидмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg2: сыръин
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScSg3: сыръи
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu1: сыръиниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu2: сыръидиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScDu3: сыръихаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl1: сыръиваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl2: сыръидаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Aor+ScPl3: сыръиˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg1: сыръидамзь
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg2: сыръинась
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScSg3: сыръись
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu1: сыръининзь
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu2: сыръидинзь
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScDu3: сыръиханзь
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl1: сыръиваць
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl2: сыръидаць
     сырць+V+IV+Conj+Prt1+ScPl3: сыръиць  
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg1: сырцудмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg2: сырцун
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScSg3: сырцу
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu1: сырцуниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu2: сырцудиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScDu3: сырцухуʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl1: сырцуваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl2: сырцудаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/nec+ScPl3: сырцуˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg1: [сырцадмʼ, сырцадма]
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg2: сырцан
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScSg3: сырца
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu1: сырцаниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu2: сырцадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScDu3: сырцахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl1: сырцаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl2: сырцадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/int+ScPl3: сырцаˮ     
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: сырмэдмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: сырмэн
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: сырмы
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: сырмэниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: сырмэдиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: сырмэхэʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: сырмэваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: сырмэдаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: сырмыˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: сырмэдамзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: сырмэнась
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [сырмысь, сырмэсь]
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: сырмэнинзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: сырмэдинзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: сырмэханзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: сырмэваць
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: сырмэдаць
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [сырмыць, сырмэць]
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg1: сыртакэдмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg2: сыртакэн 
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScSg3: сыртакы
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu1: сыртакэниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu2: сыртакэдиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScDu3: сыртакэхэʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl1: сыртакэваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl2: сыртакэдаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Aor+ScPl3: сыртакыˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg1: сыртакэдамзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg2: сыртакэнась
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScSg3: сыртакысь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu1: сыртакэнинзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu2: сыртакэдинзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScDu3: сыртакэханзь
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl1: сыртакэваць 
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl2: сыртакэдаць 
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/prob+Prt1+ScPl3: сыртакыць
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg1: сырмэкэдмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg2: сырмэкэн
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScSg3: сырмэкы
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu1: сырмэкэниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu2: сырмэкэдиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScDu3: сырмэкэхэʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl1: сырмэкэваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl2: сырмэкэдаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfprob+ScPl3: сырмэкыˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg1: сырцакэдмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg2: сырцакэн
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScSg3: сырцакы
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu1: сырцакэниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu2: сырцакэдиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScDu3: сырцакэхэʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl1: сырцакэваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl2: сырцакэдаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/obl+ScPl3: сырцакыˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1: сыртарахадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2: сыртарахан
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3: сыртараха
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1: сыртараханиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2: сыртарахадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3: сыртарахахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1: сыртарахаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2: сыртарахадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3: сыртарахаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1: сыртарахадамзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2: сыртараханась
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3: сыртарахась
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1: сыртараханинзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2: сыртарахадинзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3: сыртарахаханзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1: сыртарахаваць
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2: сыртарахадаць
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3: сыртарахаць
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1: сырмэрахадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2: сырмэрахан
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3: сырмэраха
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1: сырмэраханиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2: сырмэрахадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3: сырмэрахахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1: сырмэрахаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2: сырмэрахадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3: сырмэрахаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: сырмандархадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: сырмандархан
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: сырмандарха
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: сырмандарханиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: сырмандархадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: сырмандархахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: сырмандархаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: сырмандархадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: сырмандархаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg1: сырманӈгабядмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg2: сырманӈгабян
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScSg3: сырманӈгабя
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu1: сырманӈгабяниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu2: сырманӈгабядиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScDu3: сырманӈгабяхаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl1: сырманӈгабяваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl2: сырманӈгабядаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/sup+ScPl3: сырманӈгабяˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: сылхавэдмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: сылхавэн
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: сылхавы
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: сылхавэниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: сылхавэдиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: сылхавэхэʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: сылхавэваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: сылхавэдаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: сылхавыˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg1: сырмнадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg2: сырмнан
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScSg3: сырмна
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu1: сырмнаниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu2: сырмнадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScDu3: сырмнахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl1: сырмнаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl2: сырмнадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/rep+ScPl3: сырмнаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg1: сылвадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg2: сылван
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScSg3: сылва
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu1: сылваниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu2: сылвадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScDu3: сылвахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl1: сылваваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl2: сылвадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Mod/des+ScPl3: сылваˮ
     
     сырць+V+IV+InfImprf: сырма
     сырць+V+IV+InfPrf: сыроˮма
     сырць+V+IV+PrcImprf: сырта
     сырць+V+IV+PrcPrf: [сырмы, сырпэй]
     сырць+V+IV+PrcFut: [сырманда, сырˮманда]
     сырць+V+IV+PrcNeg: [сырмдавэй, сырˮмдавэй]
     сырць+V+IV+Ger: сырць
     сырць+V+IV+GerFin: сырманзь
     сырць+V+IV+Subord: сырпˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Aud: [сырмоʼ, сырманоʼ]
     сырць+V+IV+Evas: [сырмоӈгад, сырˮмоӈгад]
     сырць+V+IV+ConNeg: сырˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+ConNeg: сыртˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxSg1: [сырпˮнани, сырпаˮни]
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxSg2: [сырпˮнанд, сырпат]
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxSg3: [сырпˮнанда, сырпата] 
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxDu1: [сырпˮнаниʼ, сырпˮниʼ]
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxDu2: [сырпˮнандиʼ, сырпатиʼ]
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxDu3: [сырпˮнандиʼ, сырпатиʼ]
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxPl1: [сырпˮнанаˮ, сырпˮнаˮ]
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxPl2: [сырпˮнандаˮ, сырпатаˮ]
     сырць+V+IV+Subord+PxPl3: [сырпˮнандоʼ, сырпатоʼ]
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: сыртадмʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: сыртан
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: сырта
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: сыртаниʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: сыртадиʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: сыртахаʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: сыртаваˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: сыртадаˮ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: сыртаˮ       
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: сыртадамзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: сыртанась
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: сыртась
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: сыртанинзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: сыртадинзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: сыртаханзʼ
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: сыртаваць
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: сыртадаць
     сырць+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: сыртаць    
